Mississippi, session 2026, SB2267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The segment of U.S. Highway 51 located in Canton, Madison County, Mississippi, commencing at its intersection with Corrections Drive and extending north for a distance of one (1) mile to its intersection with South Union Street, is designated and shall be known as the "Judge Lloyd Gilmer Spivey III Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 65-3-38.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-3-38.1.  (1) * * *No highway, road, street or bridge on the designated state highway system may be named after any person elected by the people to any public office in this state during the term of such person's office or for a period of ten (10) years after such person no longer served in any such office. (2) No legislation shall be enacted by the Legislature naming any highway, road, street or bridge on the designated state highway system after any person unless the governing body of each county and municipality where the highway, road, street or bridge is located duly adopts a resolution requesting the Legislature to enact such legislation and files a certified copy of such resolution with the Chairman of the Senate or House Committee to which such legislation is referred. ( * * *32)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to Sections 65-7-151 and 65-7-153. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.